Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 3. Tuberculosis Modified Accredited Areas

Cross references. —

As to tuberculin test of dairy cattle generally, see §§

11-19-201

to

11-19-215

.

As to brucellosis test of cattle, see §

11-19-401

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 66 to 68, 73 to 98; 36A C.J.S. Food §§ 3 to 49.

§§ 11-19-301 and 11-19-302.
[Repealed.]

History.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 12 § 2.

§ 11-19-303.
Appropriations by counties for control of diseases.

The board of county commissioners
may appropriate as much money as it deems necessary for the control
and eradication of any infectious, contagious or communicable diseases
of livestock. The funds shall be used in cooperation with the state
veterinarian or the United States department of agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service (APHIS) in
testing animals and disposing of diseased animals disclosed by the
tests as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 87, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 67-802; C.S. 1945, § 46-602; W.S. 1957, § 11-310; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-303; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “veterinary services,” before “United States” and added “animal and plant health inspection service (APHIS).”

§ 11-19-304.
Prohibition on importation of cattle or bison; penalties.

Any person bringing cattle or bison into any
tuberculosis accredited-free area except in compliance with the rules and regulations made by the
state veterinarian shall upon conviction be punished
as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 87, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 67-805; C.S. 1945, § 46-605; W.S. 1957, § 11-311; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-304; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2004 amendment

inserted “for” following “be punished by imprisonment.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “cattle or bison into any tuberculosis accredited-free area” for “cattle into any ’tuberculosis modified accredited area’” and “as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

” for “by imprisonment for not more than (1) year, or by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or both.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 11-19-305.
Powers of state veterinarian.

The state veterinarian may make and enforce rules and regulations necessary for the enforcement of W.S.

11-19-303

through

11-19-306

.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 87, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 67-804; C.S. 1945, § 46-604; W.S. 1957, § 11-312; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-305; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “ W.S.

11-19-303

” for “ W.S.

11-19-301

.”

§ 11-19-306.
Penalties for violation of rules and regulations.

Any person who violates
any lawful rule or regulation made by the state veterinarian pursuant
to W.S.

11-19-305

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction, shall
be punished
as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 87, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 67-806; C.S. 1945, § 46-606; W.S. 1957, § 11-313; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-306; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

” for “by imprisonment for not more than (1) year, or by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or both.”